foma_files/adj.foma
####################################################################################

                                    ##############
                                    #            #
                                    # ADJECTIVES #
                                    #            #
                                    ##############


#################################################################################### 

# requires verbs/nouns to be called before this one


define neg=adj [ " ma[+Neg]" : {ma}];


## Adjectivized NOUNS

define n=adjz [NRoot prop=priv];


## Adjectived VERBS

# intransitive roots in the examples
define VRootInt=adjtz [ [ "jo[VRoot.I]" : {jo} ]
				      | [ "ka[VRoot.I]" : {ka} ]
				  	  | [ "wini[VRoot.I]" : {wini} ]
				  	  | [ "sina[VRoot.I]" : {sina} ]
				  	  | [ "sina[VRoot.I]" : {siná} ]
				  	  | [ "ransa[VRoot.I]" : {ransa} ]
				  	  | [ "janso[VRoot.I]" : {janso} ]
				  	  | [ "pi[VRoot.I]" : {pi} ]
				  	  | [ "wini[VRoot.I]" : {wini} ]
				  	  | [ "i[VRoot.I]" : {i} ]
 					];

define adjz=v=suff [ [ " mis[+Agtz]" : {mis}]
				   | [ " yosma[+Agtz]" : "^AGTZ" ]
				   | [ " kas[+Agtz]" : {kas} ]
];

define adjz=allm [ ["^AGTZ" -> {yosma} || [a|e|o|u] _ ]
				 | ["^AGTZ" -> {yosma} || Cons _ ]
				 | ["^AGTZ" -> {osma} || i _ ]
				 | ["^AGTZ" -> {isma} || [á|é|ó|ú] _ ]
				];

# past participal (verb up to slot 16/final::pp) -> adj

define v=pp [ [trans=8 | intrans=8] (v=habitual) (plural) (tense) less=fixed=clitics^{0,2} (plural) (preventive) pp=suff ];

define v=a=ss [ [VRootInt=adjtz | VRootTrans] adjz=v=suff ];


# numerals have its own category

# gather all cats
define adj=suff [ neg=adj
				| intens=verymuch
				| [ " cha[+Adv]" : {cha} ]
				];

define adjectives [ ["[ADJ] " : 0] 
					[ [adj=roots (neg=adj) (dim=depr) (adv=suff) (n=erg)]
					  | n=adjz
					  | v=a=ss
					  | v=pp
					  | adv=roots
					] ([int=emphatic | int1=suff | int2=suff]) ]
					.o. adjz=allm
					.o. dep=allm .o. erg=allm
					.o. malve=trans=allm .o. mid=allm; # .o. vowel=uncollapse;
